Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2883
Delegated dispensing permit; liability; when.

The delegating pharmacist or the on-call pharmacist shall not be held liable for acts or omissions on the part of an individual dispensing pursuant to the delegated dispensing permit.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 58;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.52;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 979.